North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 20. Basic Rights.

§ 7B-2000.
Juvenile’s right to counsel; presumption of indigence.

A juvenile alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the court has the right to be represented by counsel in all proceedings. Counsel for the juvenile shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, unless counsel is retained for the juvenile, in any proceeding in which the juvenile is alleged to be (i) delinquent or (ii) in contempt of court when alleged or adjudicated to be undisciplined.

All juveniles shall be conclusively presumed to be indigent, and it shall not be necessary for the court to receive from any juvenile an affidavit of indigency.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-144, s. 22.

§ 7B-2001.
Appointment of guardian.

In any case when no parent, guardian, or custodian appears in a hearing with the juvenile or when the court finds it would be in the best interests of the juvenile, the court may appoint a guardian of the person for the juvenile. The guardian shall operate under the supervision of the court with or without bond and shall file only such reports as the court shall require. Unless the court orders otherwise, the guardian:

Shall have the care, custody, and control of the juvenile or may arrange a suitable placement for the juvenile.

May represent the juvenile in legal actions before any court.

May consent to certain actions on the part of the juvenile in place of the parent or custodian, including (i) marriage, (ii) enlisting in the Armed Forces of the United States, and (iii) enrollment in school.

May consent to any necessary remedial, psychological, medical, or surgical treatment for the juvenile.

The authority of the guardian shall continue until the guardianship is terminated by court order, until the juvenile is emancipated pursuant to Subchapter IV of this Chapter, or until the juvenile reaches the age of majority.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1997-390, s. 7; 1998-202, s. 6; 2011-183, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 5, effective June 20, 2011, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “armed forces” in subdivision (3).

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

§ 7B-2002.
Payment of court-appointed attorney.

An attorney appointed pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2000

or pursuant to any other provision of this Subchapter shall be paid a reasonable fee in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. The court may require payment of the attorneys’ fees from a person other than the juvenile as provided in

G.S. 7A-450.1

, 7A-450.2, and 7A-450.3. A person who does not comply with the court’s order of payment may be found in civil contempt as provided in

G.S. 5A-21

.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1983, c. 726, ss. 2, 3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 6; 1991, c. 575, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-144, s. 23.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.